Wisconsin, session 2025, SB627.
do enact as follows:SB627,13Section 1. 757.023 of the statutes is created to read:SB627,2,24757.023 Maximum age for justices and judges. (1) No person may be 5elected or appointed to serve as a supreme court justice or judge of a court of record 1if the date of election or appointment occurs on or after the date the person attains 2the age of 75 years.SB627,2,43(2) Subsection (1) does not apply to a temporary reserve judge appointed 4under s. 753.075.SB627,2,55